District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.80

Business opportunities.

(a)

The taking advantage, directly or indirectly, by a director of a business opportunity shall not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against the director, in a proceeding by or in the right of the nonprofit corporation on the ground that the opportunity should have first been offered to the corporation, if before becoming legally obligated or entitled respecting the opportunity the director brings it to the attention of the corporation and action by the members or the directors disclaiming the corporation’s interest in the opportunity is taken in compliance with the procedures set forth in § 29-406.70, as if the decision being made concerned a conflicting interest transaction.

(b)

In any proceeding seeking equitable relief or other remedies, based upon an alleged improper taking advantage of a business opportunity by a director, the fact that the director did not employ the procedure described in subsection (a) of this section before taking advantage of the opportunity shall not support an inference that the opportunity should have been first presented to the nonprofit corporation or alter the burden of proof otherwise applicable to establish that the director breached a duty to the corporation in the circumstances.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term “director” includes a member of a designated body.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-406.31.